North Carolina, session 2025, HB774.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-263(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) As a part of the function of the public school system, local boards of education public
school units shall have a school food authority to provide to the extent practicable school nutrition
services in the schools under their jurisdiction. The school food authority shall provide breakfast
service at no cost to students in accordance with G.S. 115C-263.5 and may offer other nutrition
services to the extent practicable. All school nutrition services made available under this authority
shall be provided in accordance with federal guidelines established by the Food and Nutrition
Service of the United States Department of Agriculture."
SECTION 1.(b) Part 2 of Article 17 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-263.5. Universal breakfast program.
*H774-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) To the extent funds are made available for the purpose, the Department of Public
Instruction shall allocate sufficient funds to public schools to provide breakfast at no cost to
students attending the school in prekindergarten through grade 12 who elect to receive breakfast.
State and federal reimbursements for the universal breakfast program shall not exceed one
hundred percent (100%) of the federal free rate of meals served. These funds shall supplement
and not supplant any federal funds provided for the same purposes.
(b) Schools are encouraged to implement innovative breakfast service models, including
breakfast in the classroom, grab-and-go breakfast, and second chance breakfast.
(c) No later than February 15 of each year that funds are made available for purposes of
this section, the Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee, at a minimum, on participation rates, costs, and program effectiveness as
measured by impact on student health, academic performance, and overall school participation."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-264 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-264. Operation.
(a) Local boards of education operating school nutrition programs shall participate in the
federal School Breakfast Program, National School Lunch Program established by the federal
government. and, if eligible, the Community Eligibility Provision Program. School nutrition
programs shall be under the jurisdiction of the Division of School Nutrition of the Department
of Public Instruction.
…
(c) All school nutrition services shall be operated on a nonprofit basis, and any earnings
therefrom over and above the cost of operation as defined herein shall be used to reduce the cost
of food, to serve more nutritious food, or to provide free or reduced-price meals to economically
disadvantaged children and for no other purpose. The term "cost of operation" means the actual
cost incurred in the purchase and preparation of food, the salaries of all personnel directly
engaged in providing nutrition services, and the cost of nonfood supplies as outlined under
standards adopted by the State Board of Education. "Personnel" means school nutrition
supervisors or directors, bookkeepers or other staff directly engaged in nutrition services record
keeping, and those persons directly involved in preparing and serving food. School nutrition
personnel shall be paid from the funds of the school nutrition program only for services rendered
on behalf of the school nutrition program. Any cost incurred in the provisions and maintenance
of school nutrition services over and beyond the cost of operation shall be included in the budget
request filed annually by local boards of education with boards of county commissioners. Local
boards of education are not required to comply with G.S. 115C-522(a) in the purchase of supplies
and food for such school nutrition services.
…."
SECTION 1.(d) Part 2 of Article 17 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-264.6. Farm-to-table initiative.
(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall develop a farm-to-table initiative to
incorporate locally sourced and fresh ingredients into the universal breakfast program under
G.S. 115C-263.5.
(b) Schools shall be encouraged to partner with local farmers and food producers to
procure fresh, seasonal, and nutritional food options.
(c) The initiative shall provide education opportunities for students to learn about
agriculture, nutrition, and sustainable food systems."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-150.14 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) A school governed by this Article shall provide school nutrition services in
accordance with Part 2 of Article 17 of this Chapter."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
Page 2 House Bill 774-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(p) A charter school shall provide school nutrition services in accordance with Part 2 of
Article 17 of this Chapter."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-238.72(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Food Nutrition Service. – The local school administrative unit identified by resolution
shall provide, to the extent practicable, school food provide school nutrition services to the
regional school. school in accordance with Part 2 of Article 17 of this Chapter. For purposes of
federal funding through the National School Lunch Program or other federally supported food
nutrition service programs, the local school administrative unit identified by resolution shall be
permitted to include eligible students enrolled in the regional school. Other participating units
shall not include students enrolled in the regional school for purposes of federally supported food
nutrition service programs."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 116-239.8(b)(4)c. reads as rewritten:
"c. Food Nutrition services. – The laboratory school shall strive to ensure
that one hundred percent (100%) muscadine grape juice is made
available to students as a part of the school's nutrition program or
through the operation of the school's vending facilities. Laboratory
schools shall provide school nutrition services in accordance with Part
2 of Article 17 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes. Upon request,
the local school administrative unit in which the laboratory school is
located shall administer the National School Lunch Program for the
laboratory school in accordance with G.S. 115C-264.school."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of thirty-nine million dollars ($39,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) of which shall be allocated to
public school units to provide a universal breakfast program as required under G.S. 115C-263.5,
as enacted by this act, and five million dollars ($5,000,000) of which shall be allocated to public
school units to support farm-to-table initiatives pursuant to G.S. 115C-264.6, as enacted by this
act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 774-First Edition Page 3